Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1437
Official in the legislative branch, defined.

Official in the legislative branch shall mean a member or member-elect of the Legislature, a member of an official body established by and responsible to the Legislature, or employee thereof other than an individual employed by the state in a clerical or nonpolicymaking capacity.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 37.